Hawaii statutes.
[§355D-5] Contracts. The director of
public safety may enter into such contracts on behalf of the State as may be
appropriate to implement the participation of the State in the Interstate
Corrections Compact pursuant to article III thereof. No such contract shall be
of any force or effect until approved by the governor and comptroller. [L 1996,
c 57, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next